Wisconsin, session 2025, SB881.
do enact as follows:SB881,13Section 1. Nonstatutory provisions.SB881,2,41(1) Retention of positions. Of the appropriation increase under Section 2 2(1) of this act, $4,025,800 shall be allocated over the 2025-27 fiscal biennium to 3provide funding for 17.0 current FED positions that shall be converted to 17.0 GPR 4positions.SB881,25Section 2. Fiscal changes.SB881,2,106(1) Crime victim services funding. In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for 7the appropriation to the department of justice under s. 20.455 (5) (a), the dollar 8amount for fiscal year 2025-26 is increased by $17,101,350. In the schedule under 9s. 20.005 (3) for the appropriation to the department of justice under s. 20.455 (5) 10(a), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2026-27 is increased by $17,101,350.SB881,2,1111